Washington statutes.
RCW 26.27.041

Application to Indian tribes.

(1) A child custody proceeding that pertains to an Indian child as defined in the federal Indian child welfare act, 25 U.S.C. Sec. 1901 et seq., is not subject to this chapter to the extent that it is governed by the federal Indian child welfare act.

(2) A court of this state shall treat a tribe as if it were a state of the United States for the purpose of applying Articles 1 and 2.

(3) A child custody determination made by a tribe under factual circumstances in substantial conformity with the jurisdictional standards of this chapter must be recognized and enforced under Article 3.

[ 2001 c 65 s 104.]